California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
(b) A commercial blood bank for animals, as described in subdivision (a), that refuses to sell animal blood or blood component products to a veterinarian in circumstances in which that blood bank has an available supply may be deemed by the secretary to be in violation of this provision against discriminatory business practices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 15.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. License Fees [9231. - 9231.]

9231.

The license application fee and license renewal fee under this chapter for an establishment proposing to produce or producing animal blood and blood component products from a closed-colony blood bank shall be as follows:

(a) The application and annual license fee shall be one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each establishment, which shall be the fee for the fiscal year, or portion thereof, ending June 30 of each year. When an applicant is a city, county, state, or district, or an official thereof, no fee shall be required under this section.

(b) Licenses shall be renewed every year. The annual renewal fee shall be paid on or before the first day of July of each year.

(c) The license application fee and licensee renewal fee under this chapter shall be adjusted annually for inflation. The adjustments shall be rounded off to the nearest whole dollar.

(d) The department may set inspection fees in an amount that shall not exceed the department’s reasonable regulatory costs incurred in connection with implementing this chapter. The fees shall include amounts sufficient to repay any amount loaned from the General Fund to establish the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 16.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Blood or Blood Component Product Registration [9241. - 9245.]

9241.

No person shall offer for sale or use any of the following:

(a) Any biologic unless it is manufactured pursuant to the terms of a valid license or permit issued by the United States Department of Agriculture.

(b) Any blood or blood component product unless it is produced in an establishment licensed by the secretary or in accordance with Article 7 (commencing with Section 4920) of Chapter 11 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or imported into the state pursuant to Section 9252 and registered with the department in accordance with Section 9244.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 17.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9242.

The secretary shall register blood or a blood component product that meets all
 of the following requirements:

(a) It is produced under acceptable procedures.

(b) It has been demonstrated to the secretary that the blood or blood component product is safe and noninjurious to animal health.

(c) It has been demonstrated to the secretary that the blood or blood component product is of value for the purpose intended.

(d) It is labeled for proper handling and use, and is not misrepresented.

(e) It is produced in an establishment that meets the requirements of Section 9210.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 235, Sec. 16.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Became operative on January 1, 2013, pursuant to Sec. 28 of Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

9244.

(a) An application for registration of blood or a blood component product shall include all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the person who owns the property, establishment, institution, or business that sells the blood.

(2) The name and address of the person who oversees the production of animal blood and blood component products.

(3) The type of animal blood and blood component products produced for sale.

(4) A full description of the building, including its address, facilities, equipment, and apparatus, to be used in production of animal blood and blood
 component products.

(5) A protocol of the methods of production in detail that is followed in the production of the product.

(6) A sample of the label to be placed on the blood or blood component product.

(b) The registration application fee and annual renewal fee for an establishment proposing to offer blood or blood component products for retail sale or use in California shall be as follows:

(1) The registration application fee and annual renewal fee shall be five hundred dollars ($500) for each product, which shall be the fee for the fiscal year, or portion thereof, ending June 30 of each year.

(2) Registration shall be renewed every year. The annual renewal fee shall be paid on or
 before July 1 of each year.

(3) The application and renewal fees under this chapter shall be adjusted annually for inflation. The adjustments shall be rounded off to the nearest whole dollar.

(4) Fees may be increased or decreased by the department but shall not exceed the department’s reasonable regulatory costs incurred to administer and enforce product safety standards set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 18.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9245.

The secretary may impose such conditions on the production or use of blood or
 blood component products as he or she deems necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 235, Sec. 19.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Became operative on January 1, 2013, pursuant to Sec. 28 of Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Rules and Regulations [9251. - 9255.]

9251.

The secretary may adopt reasonably necessary rules and regulations for the
 administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 235, Sec. 20.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Became operative on January 1, 2013, pursuant to Sec. 28 of Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

9252.

(a) The secretary shall track, administer, and enforce the safe importation and sale of animal blood and blood component products from out-of-state blood banks for animals that produce those blood and blood component products in compliance with California standards.

(b) Importation and sale of canine blood and blood component products from out-of-state sources shall only be permitted from community blood banks.

(c) Out-of-state community blood banks that sell canine blood and blood component products in California under this section shall submit a quarterly report to the department every three months that includes the separate total amounts of canine whole blood, packed red blood
 cells, and fresh frozen plasma sold in the state during that quarter, in estimated milliliters based on weight in grams.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 19.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9253.

(a) A closed-colony blood bank licensed under this chapter shall maintain an onsite record of the number of donations collected from captive animals, the amount of blood collected per donation in estimated milliliters based on weight in grams, any adverse events, the disposition of any animals, and any other information necessary to comply with this section.

(b) A closed-colony blood bank licensed under this chapter shall submit a quarterly report to the department every three months including all of the following:

(1) The number of donations from captive animals and separate total amount in milliliters of whole blood, packed red blood cells, and fresh frozen plasma sold in
 California during that quarter, by species of animal in estimated milliliters based on weight in grams.

(2) The number of captive animals kept, housed, or maintained at the closed-colony blood bank, by species of animal.

(3) The disposition records of any animals and the total number of animals released for adoption.

(4) The number and species of animals experiencing adverse events, the total number of adverse events, and the nature of adverse events experienced by captive animals that donate blood.

(5) The number and species of animal donors whose blood tested positive for known pathogens, in accordance with the best clinical practices in the veterinary field, which may include the most recent Consensus Statement for blood donor infectious disease
 screening by the American College of Veterinary Internal Medicine.

(c) A violation of this section, Section 9210, or Section 9212 shall constitute a cause for corrective action, suspension, restriction, or the nonrenewal or revocation of a license by the department. The proceedings for the suspension or revocation of a license shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The secretary shall have all the powers granted in that chapter.

(d) For purposes of this section, “disposition” means adoption, euthanasia, transfer to another blood bank, breeding facility, farm, animal control agency, animal shelter, or rescue organization, or donation or sale for medical research or other purpose. Disposition records shall include all of the following:

(1) The species and breed of animal.

(2) The animal’s registered name, license number, microchip, and tattoo, if present.

(3) The name and address of the individual or entity that received the animal and the purpose for which the animal was received.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 20.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9254.

The department shall annually submit a copy of the canine blood collection information that it publicly posts on its internet website pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 9212.5 to the Chair and Vice Chair of the Assembly Business and Professions Committee, the Chair and Vice Chair of the Senate Business, Professions and Economic Development Committee, the Chairs and Vice Chairs of the Assembly and Senate Agriculture Committees, and the Veterinary Medical Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 21.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

9255.

(a) The department, in collaboration with the Veterinary Medical Board, technical experts in animal blood banking, and any other relevant stakeholders, shall develop and make available a “Community Animal Blood Banking Guidance Resource” or other documents that provide veterinarians, at a minimum, accurate, clear, and concise information regarding best management practices for operating community blood banks.

(b) On or before March 1, 2023, the department shall publish the guidance resource or other documents described in subdivision (a) on its
 internet website. The guidance resource or other documents shall include primary information and best practices in all of the following areas:

(1) Animal donor qualification, selection, and screening.

(2) Bloodborne pathogen testing.

(3) Safe blood products handling, processing, labeling, and storage.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 22.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Enforcement [9261. - 9269.]

9261.

License for any commercial blood bank for animals or registration of any blood
 or blood component product may be denied, suspended, or revoked by the secretary for failure to meet the requirements of this chapter or for the violation of any provision of this chapter, or of any rule or regulation adopted by the secretary under this chapter. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 235, Sec. 21.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Became operative on January 1, 2013, pursuant to Sec. 28 of Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

9262.

The biologics prepared prior to July 1, 1975, in laboratories licensed pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, which have an expiration date of July 1, 1975, or later, are not subject to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 776.)
-------------------------------------------

9263.

If the secretary finds that blood or blood component products do not conform
 to the requirements of Section 9242 or the use or continued use of such products constitutes an immediate danger to animals, the secretary may, after notice, suspend the registration of those blood or blood component products or license of an establishment producing those blood or blood component products pending a hearing and final decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 235, Sec. 22.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Became operative on January 1, 2013, pursuant to Sec. 28 of Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

9264.

(a) If the secretary finds blood or blood component
 products that do not meet the requirements of Section 9242, the secretary may order those blood or blood component products to be held on the premises where found or elsewhere until he or she has determined that the products may be safely released for the purposes intended.

(b) The secretary may order the destruction of any blood or blood component products under a hold order if the blood or blood component products cannot be made to meet the requirements of Section 9242.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 235, Sec. 23.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Became operative on January 1, 2013, pursuant to Sec. 28 of Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

9266.

The department, or humane officers under contract with the department, shall inspect commercial blood banks for animals licensed by the department at least once a year to ensure compliance with the protocols required by subdivision (e) of Section 9221.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 822, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

9267.

Notwithstanding Section 4827 of the Business and Professions Code, for commercial blood banks for animals licensed by the department, anesthesia shall be performed pursuant to Section 4826 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 235, Sec. 24.   (AB 1709)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Became operative on January 1, 2013, pursuant to Sec. 28 of Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

9268.

The requirements set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 9212, subdivision (e) of Section 9221, subdivision (c) of Section 9231, and Sections 9266 and 9267:

(a) Shall not apply to those facilities required to be inspected by the United States Department of Agriculture in accordance with the Animal Welfare Act (Chapter 54 (commencing with Section 2131) of Title 7 of the United States Code).

(b) Shall apply to those facilities housing blood donor animals under contract with commercial blood banks for animals licensed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 289, Sec. 4.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

9269.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) shall apply to all records held by the department relating to this chapter, including, but not limited to, records relating to applications, fees, or inspections required by this chapter.

(b) (1) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d), identifying personal information that is contained in records described in subdivision (a) shall be confidential and not subject to disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the
 Government Code).

(2) This subdivision does not prevent the disclosure by the department of data regarding age, race, ethnicity, national origin, or gender of individuals whose personal information is protected pursuant to this section, so long as the data does not contain individually identifiable information.

(c) Records held by the department relating to this chapter shall be accessible to law enforcement officers and state and local agencies with jurisdiction over any matter covered by this chapter.

(d) The department shall, upon request, disclose information in records relating to this chapter that is already in the public domain.

(e) (1) For purposes of this section, “identifying personal information” means the following information pertaining to the owner of an animal donor that is collected for purposes of coordinating, conducting, or documenting a donation from the animal owned by that person and is maintained by the department in relation to this chapter:

(A) Social security number.

(B) Date of birth.

(C) Physical description.

(D) Home address.

(E) Statements of personal worth or personal financial data.

(F) Personal medical
 history.

(G) Employment history.

(H) Email address.

(I) Information that reveals any electronic network location or identity.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, a person who owns, operates, maintains, or oversees a commercial blood bank for animals shall not be considered the owner of an animal donor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 48.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Exemptions [9272. - 9272.]

9272.

This chapter shall not apply to any of the following:

(a) Licensed facilities primarily engaged in the collection, preparation, testing, processing, storage, or distribution of human blood or blood products, and any biologic as defined in Section 9201 produced by that facility is sold or distributed only to an establishment licensed by this chapter.

(b) Clinical laboratories licensed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1200) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code whose only biologics are autogenous bacterins prepared at the request of licensed veterinarians.

(c) Licensed private veterinarians who collect blood or blood products solely for
 use in their own practice or pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 4920) of Chapter 11 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, except with respect to Article 5 (commencing with Section 9241) and Section 9255.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 752, Sec. 24.   (AB 1282)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Scabies and Ticks [9301. - 9352.]



  ARTICLE 1. Treatment [9301. - 9307.]

9301.

When moved for the purpose of immediate slaughter, cattle which are infected with, or exposed to, the Boophilus annulatus tick shall be dipped or treated in the manner which is prescribed by the department, unless they are to be loaded directly on railroad cars at the point of origin.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9302.

If upon examination of any cattle or sheep, the director finds any cattle which are infected with the Boophilus annulatus tick, or sheep or cattle which are infected with, or exposed to, scabies, he shall forthwith notify, in writing, the owner or person that is in control of the cattle or sheep to dip or otherwise treat them as directed for the purpose of eradicating the tick or scabies. The owner or person that is in control of the cattle or sheep shall comply with the notice within 10 days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9303.

If, at the expiration of 10 days from the date on which notice was given, the owner or person in control of the cattle or sheep has failed to dip the cattle or sheep in accordance with the directions of the director, the director shall immediately take possession of the cattle or sheep and dip the sheep as many times as may be necessary, or dip or otherwise treat the cattle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9304.

If upon examination at the end of the 10 days the director finds that the cattle have been dipped or otherwise treated for the extermination of ticks but are still infected, he shall instruct the owner or person in possession of the cattle to continue the dipping or treatment as the circumstances may demand, and within such time as the department deems advisable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9305.

If upon examination at any time the department finds that the cattle are again infected with the ticks or that the owner or person in control of the cattle has not continued to properly dip or otherwise treat the cattle as instructed, the director shall take possession of the cattle and dip or otherwise treat them.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9306.

If the director has reason to believe that the disease known as scabies exists in a flock of sheep or in a herd of cattle, he shall notify the owner or person that is in control of the sheep or cattle to gather all the sheep or cattle in a corral in order that the sheep or cattle may be examined to ascertain if any are so infected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9307.

If the owner or person that is in control of the sheep or cattle does not gather all of the sheep or cattle in a corral for the examination, the director shall gather the sheep or cattle in a corral for the examination. He may hire such necessary help as may be required to gather the sheep or cattle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Civil Liability [9331. - 9333.]

9331.

All expenses and costs of dipping or treating cattle or sheep and all expenses and costs of gathering sheep or cattle which are incurred by the department pursuant to this chapter are a lien on the cattle or sheep until the lien is paid or foreclosed by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9332.

If the lien is not paid within 15 days after the expenses and costs were incurred, the department shall, in the name of the people of the State of California, commence an action to foreclose the lien. The action shall be commenced, tried, and determined in all respects as provided by law for the foreclosure of mortgages on personal property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9333.

In any civil proceeding which arises under this chapter, all persons that have an interest in, or control or possession of, the cattle or sheep concerning which the proceeding is had, are liable severally and jointly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Violations [9351. - 9352.]

9351.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully sell, except for immediate slaughter, or expose in such a manner as may infect other livestock not so infected, any cattle which have or are infected with the Boophilus annulatus tick.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9352.

It is unlawful for any person to knowingly sell any sheep or cattle which are infected with scabies, or to expose them in such a manner as may infect other sheep or cattle which are not infected with scabies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Animal Quarantine [9501. - 9702.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [9501. - 9503.]

9501.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9502.

“Animal,” “livestock,” or “domestic animal,” includes poultry.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9503.

“Poultry” includes all domesticated fowl and any wild fowl or bird which is reduced to captivity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Inspections [9531. - 9532.]

9531.

If the director receives information of the existence of any contagious, infectious, or transmissible disease which affects domestic animals within this state, he shall thoroughly investigate it. In making such an investigation, he may enter any premises and inspect any animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9532.

This chapter does not deprive the regular inspectors who are employed by any chartered or incorporated city, or city and county, after they have passed a civil service meat, market, and poultry inspection examination, of the powers which are granted them by such city, or city and county, to inspect animals.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Establishment of Quarantine [9561. - 9574.]

9561.

The State Veterinarian may establish such quarantine, sanitary, and police regulations as may be necessary to prevent, circumscribe, or exterminate, any condition designated pursuant to Section 9562.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9562.

(a) Subject to the rights and procedures established pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to this code, the State Veterinarian shall impose a quarantine if he or she believes, upon any basis reasonably supportable by standard epidemiological practice or credible scientific research, that a population of domestic animals or food product from animals has contracted, or may carry, an illness, infection, pathogen, contagion,
 toxin, or condition that, without intervention, could transmit an illness that could kill or seriously damage other animals or humans, including, in addition to the original condition, those clinically plausible secondary illnesses, infections, pathogens, contagions, toxins, or conditions arising from the effects of the original.

(b) (1) Because the authority conferred by this section is designed to protect the health and safety of the citizens of this state, the authority shall be interpreted broadly to give full effect to the purpose of protecting the public health and safety and shall be construed to include the imposition of quarantines in the circumstances of natural disaster, whether occurring or imminent, or declared emergencies.

(2) In furtherance of the objectives of the quarantine, the State Veterinarian may impose restrictions not only on the
 affected animals themselves and the uses to which those animals may be put, but on products produced from, by, or with those animals in order to minimize the risk or spread of food-borne illness.

(3) The State Veterinarian’s quarantine powers set forth in this section expressly include the power to order movement, segregation, isolation, or destruction of animals or food products, as well as the power to hold animals or food products in place.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

9563.

It is unlawful for any person to move or allow to be moved any of the animals, food product from animals, vehicles, farm equipment, farm products, or other materials that are subject to restrictions established pursuant to Section 9562 or 9569 unless that person has first obtained authorization from the State Veterinarian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9564.

If it is necessary to restrict the movements of animals pursuant to Section 9562, the State Veterinarian may fix and proclaim the boundaries of a quarantine area in lieu of separate, individual orders issued to each owner pursuant to Section 9562. While the boundaries are in force, it is unlawful for any person to move or allow to be moved any such animals from or within the boundaries of the quarantine area, unless that person is authorized to do so by the State Veterinarian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9569.

In addition to actions that may be directed by the State Veterinarian pursuant to Section 9562, the State Veterinarian may:

(a) Regulate, restrict, or restrain the movements of persons, vehicles, farm equipment, farm and dairy products, and other property from or into the quarantine area, or from place to place within it, during the existence of the quarantine.

(b) Impose, as a condition to travel through or within the quarantine
 area, that no person or vehicle which is permitted to travel on any road or highway shall depart from the road or highway while within the quarantine area.

(c) Order all animals within the quarantine area to be detained for purposes of examination or inspection at any place which is specified by him or her in the order.

(d) Cause to be destroyed all animals or property which may be found within the area that are affected with the disease, infestation, or condition or which have been so exposed as to be dangerous to themselves or other animals.

(e) Require a proper disposal to be made of the hide and carcass of any animal which is destroyed.

(f) Adopt and enforce all necessary regulations for cleaning and disinfecting any premises or property where the
 disease, infestation, or condition exists or has existed by treatment, disposal, or otherwise, and such other regulations as he may deem necessary to eradicate the disease and to prevent its dissemination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9570.

If the State Veterinarian invokes Section 9562, and the importation of animals, animal products, or other property from any state, territory, or foreign country may transmit, carry or disseminate the illness, infection, pathogen, contagion, toxin, or condition designated pursuant to Section 9562, the State Veterinarian shall prescribe the conditions, if any, under which these animals, animal products, or property may be imported into this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9573.

A quarantine shall not be established by one county or city against another county or city on account of the existence of any disease or condition subject to the authority of the State Veterinarian pursuant to Section 9562 or 9569.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9574.

(a) Any person who negligently or intentionally violates any state or federal law or regulation, including any quarantine regulation, by moving any animal or other article, which by virtue of being pest infested or disease infected, causes an infestation or infection of a pest, animal, or disease, or causes an existing infestation to spread beyond any quarantine boundaries is liable civilly in a sum not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each act that constitutes a violation of the law or regulation.

(b) The Attorney General, upon request of the State Veterinarian, shall petition the superior court to impose, assess, and recover the sum imposed pursuant to subdivision (a). In determining the amount to be imposed, the court shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of harm caused by the violation and the nature and persistence of the violation.

(c) The remedy under this section is in addition to, and does not supersede or limit, any and all other remedies, civil or criminal, that are otherwise available to the state.

(d) Any funds recovered pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund for emergency pest or disease exclusion, detection, eradication, and research of agricultural plant or animal pests or diseases. These funds may be allocated to cover costs related
 to the enforcement of this division. These funds are in addition to any funds appropriated for those purposes pursuant to Section 224.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 289, Sec. 6.   (AB 3252)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Compensable Destruction of Diseased Animals [9591. - 9595.]

9591.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 9595, if any animal or property is destroyed pursuant to Section 9569, the owner of the animal or property shall be paid an amount of money as provided in Section 9593.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 599.)
-------------------------------------------

9592.

The state may contribute toward the payment for the animal or property destroyed if either of the following occurs:

(a) The United States agrees to share equally in the payment.

(b) The State Veterinarian finds that the failure to dispose of the animal, animal product, or property would be or would have been detrimental to human or animal health or the welfare of that animal industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9593.

(a) The value of the animal or property prior to its destruction for which contribution is made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 9592 shall be determined by an appraisal process agreed upon by the secretary of the Department of Food and Agriculture and the Secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture.

(b) The value of the animal or property prior to its destruction for which contribution is made pursuant to Section 9592 shall be expeditiously determined by
 the secretary in consultation with the affected industry.

(c) Nothing in this provision shall be construed to require appraisal or payment before destruction is carried out.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 503, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

9594.

The department may pay from any money which is available for the support of the department all sums that are due or to become due from the state to owners of animals or property which is taken, destroyed, or otherwise disposed of pursuant to any provision of this code that relates to the control, prevention, or eradication of disease in animals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 599.)
-------------------------------------------

9595.

Indemnity payments provided by this division shall not be paid for any animal or property which is taken, destroyed, or otherwise disposed of pursuant to any provision of this code that relates to the control, prevention, or eradication of disease, if the owner is in violation of any quarantine order issued pursuant to this division or any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 599.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Noncompensable Destruction of Diseased Animals [9621. - 9621.]

9621.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 9571, every horse, mule, or other animal which is affected with dourine, as shown by a complement-fixation test, is a public nuisance, and shall be immediately destroyed under the direction and supervision of the department. No indemnity shall be paid for such animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Importation [9641.5. - 9641.7.]

9641.5.

(a) Any horse or other Equidae brought into this state shall be accompanied by the following:

(1) A certificate of health from the state of origin issued by an accredited veterinarian. The certificate shall state that the horse or other Equidae is free from evidence of any communicable disease.

(2) Verification that any horse or Equidae has been tested within the preceding 12 months and found negative to a test for equine infectious anemia. The test shall be approved by the secretary and conducted by a laboratory approved by the United States Department of Agriculture, and the necessary sample shall be taken, and the verification signed by, an accredited veterinarian.

(b) A nursing foal of less than six months of age when accompanied by a negative dam and any horse or other Equidae consigned for immediate slaughter shall be exempt from the testing requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   (AB 1597)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

9641.6.

(a) The director may issue a permit, valid on January 1 and renewable on or before January 1 of each year thereafter, that exempts any working horse from the requirements of Section 9641.5 under all of the following conditions: 

(1) The applicant owns or operates a business or businesses located in both this state and in another state in which horses are used in the operation of the business or businesses.

(2) The horse is moved across the state border from one business location to the other.

(b) The director may require the applicant to furnish any information that the director determines to be necessary as part of the application process.

(c) “Working horse” means a horse used for livestock husbandry or for other ranch-related activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 913, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

9641.7.

Any positive test for equine infectious anemia performed in a California laboratory shall be reported by telephone within 24 hours to the department by the laboratory making the test.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1030.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Interagency Cooperation [9671. - 9674.]

9671.

The director shall meet periodically with the livestock sanitary officials or committees of other states, the duly authorized agricultural representatives of other states and of the United States, or any of them, for the purpose of coordinating livestock sanitary activities within this state and among the several states which have common or similar problems in the field of livestock disease and the prevention, quarantine, eradication, or control of livestock disease.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9672.

A county may appropriate and expend money from the general fund of the county to carry on investigation, inspection, control, and eradication of disease in domestic animals. For such purposes it may enter into agreements with the department or with any other county and the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

9673.

An agreement which is entered into pursuant to Section 9672 may do all of the following:

(a) Provide that payments from the county treasuries may be made to the department and disbursed only for investigation, inspection, control and eradication of disease in domestic animals within any county which is a party to the agreement.

(b) Provide that the department shall have full control and supervision in carrying on the work which is provided for.

(c) Be continued for a definite term
 or until rescinded or terminated.

(d) Provide for the method by which it may be rescinded or terminated by any of the parties to the agreement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)